Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5079.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CANCELLATION.new text end new text begin The appropriation under Laws 2025, chapter 30, article 1, section 3, subdivision 2, paragraph (p), is canceled to the general fund by June 30, 2026. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end